California, session 20252026, AB2097.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 273.5 of the Penal Code is amended to read:273.5. (a) (1) A person who willfully inflicts corporal injury resulting in a traumatic condition upon a victim described in subdivision (b) is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of up to six thousand dollars ($6,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.(2) A person who knowingly impedes the normal breathing or bloodflow of a victim described in subdivision (b) by applying pressure on the throat, neck, or chest or by obstructing the nose or mouth is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in state prison for two, three, or four years, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of up to six thousand dollars ($6,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply if the victim is or was one or more of the following:(1) The offender’s spouse or former spouse.(2) The offender’s cohabitant or former cohabitant.(3) The offender’s fiance, or someone with whom the offender has, or previously had, an engagement or dating relationship, as defined in paragraph (10) of subdivision (f) of Section 243.(4) The mother or father of the offender’s child.(c) Holding oneself out to be the spouse of the person with whom one is cohabiting is not necessary to constitute cohabitation as the term is used in this section.(d) As used in this section, “traumatic condition” means a condition of the body, such as a wound, or external or internal injury, including, but not limited to, injury as a result of strangulation or suffocation, whether of a minor or serious nature, caused by a physical force. For purposes of this section, “strangulation” and “suffocation” include impeding the normal breathing or circulation of the blood of a person by applying pressure on the throat or neck.(e) For the purpose of this section, a person shall be considered the father or mother of another person’s child if the alleged male parent is presumed the natural father under Sections 7611 and 7612 of the Family Code.(f) (1) A person convicted of violating this section for acts occurring within seven years of a previous conviction under subdivision (a), or subdivision (d) of Section 243, or Section 243.4, 244, 244.5, or 245, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment in the state prison for two, four, or five years, or by both imprisonment and a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).(2) A person convicted of a violation of this section for acts occurring within seven years of a previous conviction under subdivision (e) of Section 243 shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(g) If probation is granted to a person convicted under subdivision (a), the court shall impose probation consistent with the provisions of Section 1203.097.(h) If probation is granted, or the execution or imposition of a sentence is suspended, for a defendant convicted under subdivision (a) who has been convicted of a prior offense specified in subdivision (f), the court shall impose one of the following conditions of probation:(1) If the defendant has suffered one prior conviction within the previous seven years for a violation of an offense specified in subdivision (f), it shall be a condition of probation, in addition to the provisions contained in Section 1203.097, that the defendant be imprisoned in a county jail for not less than 15 days.(2) If the defendant has suffered two or more prior convictions within the previous seven years for a violation of an offense specified in subdivision (f), it shall be a condition of probation, in addition to the provisions contained in Section 1203.097, that the defendant be imprisoned in a county jail for not less than 60 days.(3) The court, upon a showing of good cause, may find that the mandatory imprisonment required by this subdivision shall not be imposed and shall state on the record its reasons for finding good cause.(i) If probation is granted upon conviction of a violation of subdivision (a), the conditions of probation may include, consistent with the terms of probation imposed pursuant to Section 1203.097, in lieu of a fine, one or both of the following requirements:(1) That the defendant make payments to a domestic violence shelter-based program, up to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), pursuant to Section 1203.097.(2) (A) That the defendant reimburse the victim for reasonable costs of counseling and other reasonable expenses that the court finds are the direct result of the defendant’s offense.(B) For an order to pay a fine, make payments to a domestic violence shelter-based program, or pay restitution as a condition of probation under this subdivision, the court shall make a determination of the defendant’s ability to pay. An order to make payments to a domestic violence shelter-based program shall not be made if it would impair the ability of the defendant to pay direct restitution to the victim or court-ordered child support. If the injury to a person who is married or in a registered domestic partnership is caused in whole or in part by the criminal acts of their spouse or domestic partner in violation of this section, the community property may not be used to discharge the liability of the offending spouse or domestic partner for restitution to the injured spouse or domestic partner, required by Section 1203.04, as operative on or before August 2, 1995, or Section 1202.4, or to a shelter for costs with regard to the injured spouse or domestic partner and dependents, required by this section, until all separate property of the offending spouse or domestic partner is exhausted.(j) (1) Upon conviction under subdivision (a), the sentencing court shall also consider issuing an order restraining the defendant from contact with the victim, which may be valid for up to 15 years, as determined by the court. It is the intent of the Legislature that the length of a restraining order be based upon the seriousness of the facts before the court, the probability of future violations, the safety of the victim and their immediate family, and the information provided to the court pursuant to Section 273.75.This protective order may be issued by the court whether the defendant is sentenced to state prison or county jail, or if imposition of sentence is suspended and the defendant is placed on probation.(2) Upon a written petition by the prosecuting attorney, defendant, or victim, the issuing court may modify or terminate a protective order for good cause provided the prosecuting attorney, defendant, and victim are notified at least 15 days before the hearing on the petition.(k) If a peace officer makes an arrest for a violation of this section, the peace officer is not required to inform the victim of their right to make a citizen’s arrest pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 836.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.